Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0204

Executing of records to be delivered for filing to secretary of state.

A record delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to chapter 23.95 RCW and this chapter must be executed as follows:

(1) A limited cooperative association's initial articles of organization must be executed by at least one person acting as an organizer.

(2) A statement of withdrawal under RCW 23.95.215 must be executed as provided in that section.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a record executed by an existing association must be executed by an officer.

(4) A record filed on behalf of a dissolved association must be executed by a person winding up activities under RCW 23.100.1006(2) or a person appointed under RCW 23.100.1006(3) to wind up those activities.

(5) Any other record delivered on behalf of a person to the secretary of state for filing must be executed by that person.

[ 2019 c 37 s 204.]